Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Long Term Care Ombudsman, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of  the General Fund, the following amounts for the
following purposes:
(1) General program and
services provided to
care facility residents ............... $ 6,885,669
(2) Public guardian and
conservator program ................ $ 3,988,427
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $894,088
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,  and in-
cluding federal Older Americans  Act funds received from the Department of Human Ser-
vices, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described  in this section, collected
or received by the Long Term Care Ombudsman.
SECTION 3.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Enrolled House Bill 5019 (HB 5019-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 10, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 15, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5019 (HB 5019-A) Page 2